California statutes. Insurance Code
(4) In the event the insurer thereafter meets or exceeds all of the requirements of subdivision (d), it may notify the commissioner at the place designated by the commissioner, in writing, and upon the passage of 45 days following receipt by the commissioner of the notice, may resume issuing policies, contracts, or agreements that provide for guarantees contemplated by subdivision (a) as long as it meets the requirements of subdivision (d). However, if the insurer believes that the resumption of the issuance of the policies, contracts, or agreements that provide for the guarantees contemplated by subdivision (a) would not be hazardous
 to its policyholders or the citizens of California, even though it does not meet the requirements specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), the insurer shall include in the notice a demonstration that the issuance of policies, contracts, or agreements containing the guarantees referred to in subdivision (a) is not hazardous to its policyholders or the citizens of California. Within the 45-day period, the commissioner may issue an order containing the requirements of paragraph (2) if, in the commissioner’s opinion, any of the requirements of subdivision (d) are not met, or resumption would violate any provision of this code or, resumption may be hazardous to the insurer, policyholders, creditors, or the public. The failure to issue an order within 45 days shall not be deemed an approval of the activities. The order shall specify the grounds upon which the commissioner is basing the order. The insurer may, within 10 days of the order, request a hearing. The hearing shall be a private hearing and shall
 commence not less than 10 days, nor more than 20 days, after the request for hearing is served on the commissioner.

(e) Policies, contracts, and agreements referred to in subdivision (a), that are not otherwise subject to filing under applicable law and regulation, shall be filed, before being marketed or issued in this state, by the insurer with the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the policies, contracts, or agreements submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) contemplate practices that are unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this code, he or she may disapprove of the forms of policies, contracts, or agreements specifying in what regard the policies, contracts, or agreements are unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this code.

(f) As an alternative to the filing and approval procedure set forth in
 subdivision (e), an insurer that satisfies eligibility criteria specified in the bulletin authorized by subdivision (g) may file with the commissioner the proposed form of the policy, contract, or agreement, together with an officer’s certificate, accompanied by an actuarial certification and demonstration, and other supporting material, all in accordance with procedures set forth in the bulletin authorized by subdivision (g). An insurer may issue and deliver a policy, contract, or agreement the day following approval by the commissioner of a filing under this subdivision. Absent explicit approval, an insurer may, no sooner than 30 working days after the filing of the policy, contract, or agreement and all required supporting documentation, issue and deliver any policy, contract, or agreement that has been filed pursuant to this subdivision if the commissioner has not notified the insurer in writing that the filing lacks the required documentation or that he or she objects to the filing upon grounds
 sufficient to disapprove the policy, contract, or agreement. The bulletin shall set forth procedures providing the insurer an opportunity to respond to any objections. If the commissioner finds that the officer’s certificate or the actuarial certification or demonstration filed in support of the policy, contract, or agreement is false or incorrect, the commissioner may, in addition to taking any other lawful measures, including suspension of authority to use the policy, contract, or agreement, declare the insurer ineligible to utilize the alternative procedure authorized by this subdivision for a period not to exceed three years from the date of the filing of the policy, contract, or agreement. The commissioner may summarily suspend the use of any policy, contract, or agreement used by the insurer pursuant to this subdivision on any grounds sufficient to disapprove the policy, contract, or agreement, or if the filing fails to include the required documents. This suspension may be prospective only. Suspension
 of use of a policy, contract, or agreement shall be in writing and shall specify the reasons for the suspension. Unless the commissioner in the suspension order or subsequent thereto specifies a later effective date for the suspension, any suspension shall be effective on the day following the receipt of the suspension order by the insurer. An insurer affected by any suspension, issued pursuant to this subdivision, of a policy, contract or agreement may refile the policy, contract, or agreement with the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (e). The commissioner may suspend or discontinue filings of policies, contracts, or agreements under this subdivision at any time upon notice to affected insurers. Any filing by an insurer of a policy, contract, or agreement under this subdivision that is not accepted by the commissioner may be filed by the insurer pursuant to subdivision (e).

(g) The commissioner may issue, and amend from time to time
 thereafter, as he or she deems appropriate, a bulletin setting forth reasonable requirements for insurers that issue policies, contracts, or agreements referred to in subdivision (a) relating to all of the following:

(1) The reserves to be maintained by insurers for those policies, contracts, or agreements.

(2) The accounting and reporting of funds credited under, assets held with respect to, and transfers to and from the insurer’s general account and separate accounts pertaining to, those policies, contracts, or agreements.

(3) The disclosure of information to be given to holders and prospective holders of those policies, contracts, or agreements.

(4) The qualification of persons selling those policies, contracts, or agreements on behalf of the
 insurers.

(5) The filing of those policies, contracts, or agreements with the commissioner.

(6) The filing with the commissioner of specified sales and financial information pertaining to those policies, contracts and agreements.

(7) The eligibility criteria and procedure for filing under subdivision (f).

(8) Other matters relating to those policies, contracts, and agreements as the commissioner considers necessary, proper, and advisable that are not inconsistent with this section. This bulletin shall have the same force and effect, and may be enforced by the commissioner to the same extent and degree, as regulations issued by the commissioner until the time that the commissioner issues additional or amended regulations.

(h) The authority granted in this section is in addition to the authority granted to life insurers by other provisions of this code and the requirements of this section shall not contravene that authority. No policy, contract, or agreement that constitutes investment return assurance pursuant to Section 10203.10 or Section 10507 may be issued pursuant to this section.

(i) Guarantees authorized by this section may only be made in connection with policies, contracts, or agreements issued to an owner that is not a natural person, and is an “accredited investor” as defined in Regulation D-Rules Governing the Limited Offer and Sale of Securities Without Registration Under the Securities Act of 1933, 17 Code of Federal Regulations Section 230.501 et seq., as promulgated by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, in transactions where the aggregate single premium or deposit
 for all policies, contracts, or agreements (excluding certificates issued under a group or master policy) issued to the owner containing guarantees authorized by this section is at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). Notwithstanding the foregoing, an insurer may issue policies, contracts, or agreements qualifying under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) above, to a pension, retirement, or retirement medical benefit or profit-sharing plan reasonably expected to receive contributions in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) within the first 12 months following issuance of the policy, contract, or agreement and that has more than 10 participants. Policies, contracts, or agreements providing coverage in this state, by certificate or otherwise, that contain guarantees authorized by this section issued on a group basis shall be issued only to groups referred to in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 2 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “guaranteed living benefit” means a benefit in a variable annuity or a variable life insurance contract providing that one or more benefit amounts available to a living contractholder, under specified conditions, will be enhanced should it fall below a given level, in the absence of the guaranteed living benefit.

(b) An insurer may deliver or issue for delivery contracts containing, or riders to variable contracts providing, guaranteed
 living benefits if all the following requirements are met:

(1) The insurer is authorized to deliver, or issue for delivery, variable insurance products in this state.

(2) The insurer meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 10506.4.

(3) The commissioner has issued a bulletin setting forth the terms and conditions under which variable contracts containing, or riders to variable contracts providing, guaranteed living benefits may be issued or delivered in this state.

(4) The variable contract or rider meets the terms and conditions for guaranteed living benefits established by the commissioner and set forth in the bulletin described in paragraph (3) and the insurer desiring to issue the variable contract or rider has satisfied
 the requirements set forth in Section 2529 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) The bulletin described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) may include provisions covering requirements similar to those included in subdivision (f) of Section 10506.4. The bulletin shall have the same force and effect, and may be enforced by the commissioner to the same extent and degree as regulations issued by the commissioner until the time that the commissioner issues additional or amended regulations pertaining to guaranteed living benefits.

(d) An insurer may not deliver or issue for delivery variable contracts containing, or riders to variable contracts providing, guaranteed living benefits except pursuant to this section. No policy, contract, rider, or agreement that constitutes investment return assurance pursuant to Section 10203.10 or 10507, or guarantee pursuant to
 Section 10506.4, may be issued pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 149.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Investment Return Assurance [10507. - 10507.4.]

10507.

(a) Any life insurance company authorized to do business in this state shall be permitted to issue and deliver individual policies in connection with the payment of benefits against the risk of loss in the value of redeemable securities of the insured investor issued by investment companies regulated by the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and whose redeemable securities are registered under the federal Securities Act of 1933, as amended. For purposes of this article, such benefits shall be referred to as “investment return assurance.”

(b) Policies providing such
 investment return assurance shall provide a benefit equal to the difference between the amount paid for such redeemable securities and the value of such redeemable securities at the earlier of either (1) the end of the policy period, or (2) the date of death of the insured.

(c) To protect the public and policyholders located in this state from hazardous operation by domestic, foreign, or alien companies, and to further the purpose and provision of this part, no domestic, foreign, or alien insurance company shall undertake the issuance of any policy providing for investment return assurance until such company has satisfied the commissioner that its condition or method of operation in connection with the issuance of such policies shall not be such as to render its operation hazardous to the public, or its policyholders in this state, and, whether domestic, foreign, or alien, that it meets the conditions prescribed in Section 717 for the issuance
 of a certificate of authority. In the determination of the qualification of a company requesting authority to issue policies providing for investment return assurance within this state, the commissioner shall consider, in addition to the requirements of Section 717, (1) the history of the company, (2) the character, responsibility, and general fitness of the officers and directors of the company, (3) the regulation of a foreign or alien company by its state of domicile, (4) the adequacy of the investment management which the company is providing, and (5) the company’s arrangements for the supervision of the marketing of such policies. No company may provide investment return assurance in its policies unless it is an admitted insurer having and maintaining a combined capital and surplus of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000).

(d) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (c), no admitted insurer may provide investment return assurance
 in its policies unless it establishes a special contingency fund of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000). This fund shall be deemed to constitute a reserve liability in addition to other reserves of such insurer. In the event such insurer writes investment return assurance both on an individual and a group basis, the special contingency fund shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000) for both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1566.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.1.

The commissioner shall require the payment of three hundred seventy-four dollars ($374), as a fee for the determination of qualification required by Section 10507. Upon completion of the determination of qualification, and whether authorization to issue policies providing investment return benefits is granted or denied, the commissioner shall require the payment of those additional amounts from the requesting insurer as may be necessary to defray all administrative costs in excess of three hundred seventy-four dollars ($374) incurred by the commissioner in making that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 64.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.2.

An investment return assurance policy evidencing such insurance, shall not be issued or delivered in this state until a copy of the form thereof is filed with the commissioner, the fees required by Section 12973.9 are paid, and the commissioner has given written approval of the form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.3.

No policy of investment return assurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state unless each such policy does all of the following:

(a) Includes a statement on the first page thereof in boldface type that, in the event that the investment covered by the policy exceeds the benefit provided under the policy, there shall be no benefit.

(b) Provides for both of the following:

(1) The reserves for all investment return assurance policies shall be computed
 and maintained on a basis which shall place an actuarially sound value on the liabilities under such policies. To provide a basis for the determination of such actuarially sound values, the commissioner, from time to time, shall adopt rules requiring the use of appropriate tables of morbidity, mortality, interest rates, and valuation methods for such reserves.

(2) Any paid-up nonforfeiture benefit available under the policy in the event of default in a premium payment due on any policy anniversary shall be such that its present value as of such anniversary shall be at least equal to the ratio of the number of years the policy has been in force to the total premium-paying period times the present value of benefits payable had the policy been kept in full force and effect for the total premium-paying period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1566.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.4.

In furtherance of the purpose of this article, the commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Portfolio Indexing [10507.5. - 10507.5.]

10507.5.

(a) An insurer may deliver or issue for delivery one or more policies, contracts, or agreements that establish the insurer’s obligations under the policies, contracts, or agreements by reference to a portfolio of assets that is not owned by or possessed by the insurer, if the following requirements are met:

(1) The insurer is authorized to deliver, or issue for delivery, life insurance policies in this state.

(2) The insurer has at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) in admitted assets or one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in capital and surplus, as reflected by the most recent financial statements on file with the commissioner. For the purposes of this section, “capital and surplus” includes capital and surplus plus the asset valuation reserve and one-half of the liability for dividends, all as reflected on the most recent financial statement on file with the commissioner.

(b) Policies, contracts, and agreements referred to in subdivision (a), that are not otherwise subject to filing under applicable law and regulation, shall be filed, before being marketed or issued in this state, by the insurer with the commissioner. If the commissioner finds that the policies, contracts, or agreements submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) contemplate practices that are unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with the
 provisions of this code, he or she may disapprove of the forms of policies, contracts, or agreements specifying in what regard the policies, contracts, or agreements are unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with the provisions of this code.

(c) As an alternative to the filing and approval procedure set forth in subdivision (b), if a bulletin is issued by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (d), an insurer that satisfies eligibility criteria specified in that bulletin may file with the commissioner the proposed form of the policy, contract, or agreement, together with an officer’s certificate, accompanied by an actuarial certification and demonstration, and other supporting material, all in accordance with procedures set forth in the bulletin authorized by subdivision (d). An insurer may issue and deliver a policy, contract, or agreement the day following approval by the commissioner of a filing under this subdivision. Absent
 explicit approval, an insurer may, no sooner than 30 working days after the filing of the policy, contract, or agreement and all required supporting documentation, issue and deliver any policy, contract, or agreement that has been filed pursuant to this subdivision if the commissioner has not notified the insurer in writing that the filing lacks the required documentation or that he or she objects to the filing upon grounds sufficient to disapprove the policy, contract, or agreement. The bulletin authorized in subdivision (d) shall set forth procedures providing the insurer an opportunity to respond to any objections. If the commissioner finds that the officer’s certificate or the actuarial certification or demonstration filed in support of the policy, contract, or agreement is false or incorrect, the commissioner may, in addition to taking any other lawful measures, including suspension of authority to use the policy, contract, or agreement, declare the insurer ineligible to utilize the alternative
 procedure authorized by this subdivision for a period not to exceed three years from the date of the filing of the policy, contract or agreement. The commissioner may summarily suspend the use of any policy, contract, or agreement used by the insurer pursuant to this subdivision on any grounds sufficient to disapprove the policy, contract, or agreement, or if the filing fails to include the required documents. This suspension may be prospective only. Suspension of use of a policy, contract, or agreement shall be in writing and shall specify the reasons for the suspension. Unless the commissioner in the suspension order or subsequent thereto specifies a later effective date for the suspension, any suspension shall be effective on the day following the receipt of the suspension order by the insurer. An insurer affected by any suspension, issued pursuant to this subdivision, of a policy, contract, or agreement may refile the policy, contract, or agreement with the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b). The
 commissioner may suspend or discontinue filings of policies, contracts, or agreements under this subdivision at any time upon notice to affected insurers. Any filing by an insurer of a policy, contract, or agreement under this subdivision that is not accepted by the commissioner may be filed by the insurer pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) The commissioner may issue, and amend from time to time thereafter, as he or she deems appropriate, a bulletin setting forth reasonable requirements for insurers that issue policies, contracts, or agreements referred to in subdivision (a), relating to all of the following:

(1) The reserves to be maintained by insurers for those policies, contracts, or agreements.

(2) The accounting and reporting of those policies, contracts, or agreements.

(3) The disclosure of information to be given to holders and prospective holders of those policies, contracts, or agreements.

(4) The qualification of persons selling those policies, contracts, or agreements on behalf of the insurers.

(5) The filing of those policies, contracts, or agreements with the commissioner.

(6) The filing with the commissioner of specified sales and financial information pertaining to those policies, contracts and agreements.

(7) The eligibility criteria and procedure for filing under subdivision (c).

(8) Other matters relating to those policies, contracts, and agreements as the commissioner considers
 necessary, proper, and advisable that are not inconsistent with this section.

This bulletin shall have the same force and effect, and may be enforced by the commissioner to the same extent and degree, as regulations issued by the commissioner until the time that the commissioner issues additional or amended regulations. 

(e) Upon completion of the determination of qualification required by subdivision (a), and, whether authorization to issue policies, contracts, or agreements referred to in subdivision (a) is granted or denied, the commissioner shall require the payment of the fee specified in Section 736 for the determination of qualification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 352, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Records [10508. - 10508.8.]

10508.

(a) It is the obligation of every insurer admitted in this state to transact life or disability insurance, or both, to maintain certain records specified in this article pertaining to the activities of its life, life and disability, and disability agents and any other agents for the inspection and examination of the commissioner.

(b) The original or certified copies of the records shall be delivered to the commissioner within a period of 30 days following receipt of written
 demand therefor.

(c) The records required to be maintained or made available in this state may be in the form of originals, carbon, or facsimile copies, microfilm copies, or electronic data-processing records if printouts are available within a reasonable period of time, and shall include, to the extent the data are pertinent and available for each insurance transaction, the names, dates, amounts and policy numbers involved. The records are composed of all of the following:

(1) The original application for each insurance policy or contract sold in this state.

(2) Records showing, for each insurance policy or contract issued, the premiums received by the insurer.

(3) Production records showing all insurance policies or contracts sold by each agent or
 other agent in the expired portion of the current calendar year and the whole of each of the preceding five calendar years.

(4) Records showing, for each insurance policy or contract issued, the amount of commissions paid and to whom.

(5) Records or memoranda identifying any agent other, than the agent whose name appears on the application who, to the actual knowledge of the insurer, handled any part of an insurance transaction for which the other agent was not compensated.

(6) Correspondence, written solicitations or proposals, or other written communications sent by the insurer to a prospect, applicant, or insured, or received from him or her by the insurer, excluding printed material in general use distributed by the insurer, either directly or indirectly through its life agents.

(7) Correspondence, written proposals, notices, a statement of reasons, or other written communications, if any, pertaining to the recision, termination, or nonrenewal of a policy or contract, or the election of nonforfeiture values thereunder, sent by an insurer to a policyholder or contractholder or received from him or her by an insurer.

(8) A copy of a written comparison of benefits, limitations, exclusions, and costs of existing accident, sickness, or long-term care coverage and proposed coverage.

(9) A copy of the outline of coverage or disclosure statement required by law or regulation.

(10) Copies of any correspondence between the policyholder or prospective policyholder and the agent or insurer.

(11) Copies of correspondence between anyone acting on behalf of the policyholder or prospective policyholder and the agent or insurer.

(d) Except as otherwise provided, the records shall be maintained for a minimum period of five years following the actual delivery of the insurance policy or contract to which each pertains, or, if no policy or contract was issued, for a minimum period of five years after the date of the application therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.5.

It shall be the obligation of each life, life and disability, and disability insurance agent and any other agent and insurer to preserve and maintain all applicable records defined in Section 10508 in his or her possession, in addition to those records transmitted to the insurer, at his or her principal place of business for a minimum of five years. The records shall be kept in an orderly manner so that the information therein is readily available, and shall be open to inspection or examination by the commissioner at all times.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 631, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.6.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is no statutory authority for the commissioner to gather information or data on life insurance, annuity, or disability products for the purpose of evaluating trends in the marketplace or the uses these contracts serve.

(b) The commissioner may collect, compile, analyze, and report data relating to life and disability insurance, annuity contracts, and related contracts offered, issued, delivered, or renewed in this state through
 any method of marketing.

(c) Any officer, manager, agent, or employee of any institution offering life and disability insurance, annuity contracts, or related contracts, shall, upon request by the commissioner, exhibit to the commissioner all books, records, accounts, documents, or agreements governing its method of operation, together with all data, statistics, and information of every kind and character collected or considered by the institution in the conduct of its operations.

(d) The commissioner may adopt reasonable rules and regulations requiring an annual reporting of the data authorized for collection under this section.

(e) The commissioner may, for the purpose of furthering the uniform administration of regulatory laws, exchange information and data with law enforcement officials of this and other states
 relating to the implementation of the reporting requirements imposed by this section, and may consult with those officials regarding that information and data.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.7.

A person subject to the requirements of Section 10508.6 who submits any false information in connection with a request for information or data pursuant to that section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). A person subject to the requirements of Section 10508.6 who fails to comply with a request for information or data pursuant to that section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each 30-day period in which the person fails to comply. If the failure to comply is
 willful, the person shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period in which the person fails to comply, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). In determining the penalty, the commissioner shall consider the good faith of the person and any similar prior violations by the person under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 166, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.8.

The commissioner shall ensure, to the furthest extent possible, that any data call issued by him or her does not conflict with any similar data call or data collection request, including, but not limited to, a request issued by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 166, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Requirements for Replacement of Life Insurance and Annuity Policies [10509. - 10509.9.]

10509.

The purpose of this article is the following:

(a) To regulate the activities of insurers and agents with respect to the replacement of existing life insurance and annuities. 

(b) To protect the interests of life insurance and annuity purchasers by establishing minimum standards of conduct to be observed in replacement transactions by the following: 

(1) Assuring that the purchaser receives information with which a decision can be made in his or her own best
 interest. 

(2) Reducing the opportunity for misrepresentation and incomplete disclosures. 

(3) Establishing penalties for failure to comply with the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 380, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.1.

This article is applicable to all individual life insurance and annuity policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 963, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.2.

(a) “Replacement” means any transaction in which new life insurance or a new annuity is to be purchased, and it is known or should be known to the proposing agent, or to the proposing insurer if there is no agent, that by reason of that transaction, the existing life insurance or annuity has been or is to be any of the following: 

(1) Lapsed, forfeited, surrendered, or otherwise terminated. 

(2) Converted to reduced paid-up insurance, continued as extended term insurance, or otherwise reduced in value by
 the use of nonforfeiture benefits or other policy values. 

(3) Amended so as to effect either a reduction in benefits or in the term for which coverage would otherwise remain in force or for which benefits would be paid. 

(4) Reissued with any reduction in cash value. 

(5) Pledged as collateral or subjected to borrowing, whether in a single loan or under a schedule of borrowing over a period of time for amounts in the aggregate exceeding 25 percent of the loan value set forth in the policy. 

(b) “Conservation” means any attempt by the existing insurer or its agent to dissuade a policyowner from the replacement of existing life insurance or annuity. Conservation does not include routine administrative procedures such as late payment reminders, late
 payment offers, or reinstatement offers. 

(c) “Direct-response sales” means any sale of life insurance or annuity where the insurer does not utilize an agent in the sale or delivery of the policy. 

(d) “Existing insurer” means the insurer whose policy is or will be changed or terminated in such a manner as described within the definition of “replacement.” 

(e) “Existing life insurance or annuity” means any life insurance or annuity in force including life insurance under a binding or conditional receipt or a life insurance policy that is within an unconditional refund period. 

(f) “Replacing insurer” means the insurer that issues a new policy which is a replacement of existing life insurance or annuity. 

(g) “Registered contract” means variable annuities, investment annuities, variable life insurance under which the death benefits and cash values vary in accordance with unit values of investments held in a separate account, or any other contracts issued by life insurers which are registered with the Federal Securities and Exchange Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.3.

(a) Unless otherwise specifically included, this article does not apply to the following:

(1) Credit life insurance.

(2) Group life insurance or group annuities.

(3) An application to the existing insurer that issued the existing life insurance when a contractual change or a conversion privilege is being exercised, or when a term conversion privilege
 is exercised among corporate affiliates.

(4) Proposed life insurance that is to replace life insurance under a binding or conditional receipt issued by the same insurer.

(5) Transactions where the replacing insurer and the existing insurer are the same; provided, however, that agents proposing replacement shall:

(A) Comply with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 10509.4.

(B) Provide and leave with the applicant a written statement containing information relating to premiums, cash values, death benefits, and outstanding indebtedness, and dividends and dividend accumulations, if any, for the existing policy, both immediately before and after replacement, and for the proposed life insurance or annuity.

(b) Registered contracts shall be exempt from the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10509.6 requiring provision of policy summary or ledger statement information; however, premium or contract contribution amounts and identification of the appropriate prospectus or offering circular shall be required in lieu thereof.

(c) “Term conversion privilege” means an option afforded by contract to certain holders of term life insurance policies that permits the policy to be converted into permanent insurance, including whole life insurance, universal life insurance, or variable life insurance, regardless of the insured’s physical condition and without a medical examination. The holder of a term life insurance policy with a term conversion privilege shall not be denied coverage or charged an additional premium for any health problems and premiums for the
 permanent policy shall be based on the same underwriting class as the term policy, regardless of any changes of health since the term policy was issued.

(d) “Corporate affiliate” means the same as “affiliate” as defined in Section 1215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.4.

(a) Each agent who accepts an application shall submit to the insurer with which an application for life insurance or annuity is presented, or as part of each application, both of the following:

(1) A statement signed by the applicant as to whether replacement of existing life insurance or annuity is involved in the transaction.

(2) A signed statement as to whether or not the agent knows replacement is or may be involved in the transaction.

(b) Where a replacement is involved, the agent shall do all of the following:

(1) Present to the applicant, not later than at the time of taking the application, a “Notice Regarding Replacement of Life Insurance” in the form as described in subdivision (d). The notice shall be signed by both the applicant and the agent and left with the applicant. Obtain with or as part of each application a list of all existing life insurance or annuities to be replaced and properly identified by name of insurer, the insured and contract number. If a contract number has not been assigned by the existing insurer, alternative identification, such as an application or receipt number, shall be listed.

(2) Leave with the applicant the original or a copy of all printed communications used for presentation to the applicant.

(3) Submit to the replacing insurer with the application a copy of the replacement notice.

(c) Every agent who uses written or printed communications in conservation shall leave with the applicant the originals of any materials used.

(d) Each agent or broker shall present to an applicant the following notice: 
NOTICE REGARDING REPLACEMENT 
 REPLACING YOUR LIFE INSURANCE POLICY OR ANNUITY? 
Are you thinking about buying a new life insurance policy or annuity and discontinuing or changing an existing one? If you are, your decision could be a good one—or a mistake. You will not know for sure unless you make a careful comparison of your existing benefits and the proposed benefits.

Make sure you understand the facts. You should ask the company or agent that sold you your existing policy to give you information about it.

Hear both sides before you decide. This way you can be sure you are making a decision that is in your best interest.

We are required by law to notify your existing company that you may be replacing their policy.(applicant)(agent)(date)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 380, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.5.

Every life insurer shall do the following:

(a) Inform its field representatives or other personnel responsible for compliance with this article of the requirements of this article.

(b) Require with, or as part of, each completed application for life insurance or annuity a statement signed by the applicant as to whether such proposed insurance or annuity will replace existing life insurance or annuity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 963, Sec. 1.)